Utah statutes.
19-6-807.   Special revenue fund -- Creation -- Deposits.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund entitled the "Waste Tire Recycling Fund."

(2)  The fund shall consist of:

(a)  the proceeds of the fee imposed under Section 19-6-805;

(b)  penalties collected under this part; and

(c)  assets transferred to and loan repayments deposited in the fund pursuant to Section 19-6-824.

(3)  Money in the fund shall be used for:

(a)  partial reimbursement of the costs of transporting, processing, recycling, or disposing of waste tires as provided in this part;

(b)  payment of administrative costs of local health departments as provided in Section 19-6-817;

(c)  payment of costs incurred by the Division of Finance in accounting for and tracking outstanding loans made under the Waste Tire Recycling Industrial Assistance Loan Program; and

(d)  payment of costs incurred by the Governor's Office of Economic Development in collecting outstanding loans made under the Waste Tire Recycling Industrial Assistance Loan Program.

(4)  The Legislature may appropriate money from the fund to pay for costs of the Department of Environmental Quality in administering and enforcing this part.

